Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Uniform Trustees’ Powers Act

386.800.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

386.805.
Powers of trustee conferred by trust or by law. [Repealed.]

386.810.
Powers of trustees conferred by this chapter. [Repealed.]

386.815.
Trustee’s office not transferable. [Repealed.]

386.820.
Power of court to permit deviation and to approve transactions involving conflict of interest.

If the duty of the trustee and his interest as trustee of another trust conflict in the exercise of a trust power, the power may be exercised only by court authorization upon petition of the trustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 48; 2014, ch. 25, § 108, effective July 15, 2014.

386.825.
Powers exercisable by joint trustees — Liability. [Repealed.]

386.830.
Third persons protected in dealing with trustee. [Repealed.]

386.835.
Application of KRS 386.805 to 386.840. [Repealed.]

386.840.
Uniformity of interpretation. [Repealed.]

386.845.
Short title. [Repealed.]